Maryland, session 2025, HB0952.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–8A–27.
(b) (1) A court record pertaining to a child is confidential and its contents may
not be divulged, by subpoena or otherwise, except by order of the court upon good cause
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0952*

HOUSE BILL 952
shown or as provided in §§ 7–303 and 22–309 of the Education Article OR IN § 11–704.1(C)
OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–704.1.
(a) In this section, “juvenile registrant” means a person who is required to be
included in the registry of juvenile sex offenders under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) A person shall be included in a registry of juvenile sex offenders that is
maintained by the Department separately from the sex offender registry if[:
(1)] the person has been adjudicated delinquent for an act that, if committed
by an adult[:
(i)] would constitute a violation of:
(1) § 3–303, § 3–304, [or § 3–307(a)(1) or (2)] § 3–307, § 3–308, § 3–309,
OR § 3–310 of the Criminal Law Article; [or
(ii)] (2) [would constitute a violation of] § 3–305 or § 3–306(a)(1)
or (2) of the Criminal Law Article as the sections existed before October 1, 2017; [and
(2) the person was a minor who was at least 14 years old at the time the
delinquent act was committed.]
(3) § 3–602 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
(4) § 3–902 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE IF THE VICTIM IS A
MINOR; OR
(5) § 11–207 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE IF THE VICTIM DOES
NOT HAVE KNOWLEDGE OF OR DOES NOT CONSENT TO THE PRODUCTION OR
DISTRIBUTION OF THE CHILD PORNOGRAPHY.
(c) The registry of juvenile sex offenders shall be accessible only by law
enforcement personnel for law enforcement purposes AND THE LOCAL SUPERINTENDENT
OR THE SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE.
(d) When the juvenile court’s jurisdiction over a juvenile registrant terminates
under § 3–8A–07 of the Courts Article OR WHEN A JUVENILE REGISTRANT REACHES
THE AGE OF 18 YEARS, WHICHEVER OCCURS LATER, the juvenile registrant shall be
removed from the registry.

HOUSE BILL 952 3
(e) A juvenile registrant shall appear in person at a location designated by the
Department of Juvenile Services every 3 months to:
(1) update and verify with the Department of Juvenile Services the
information included in the registry of juvenile sex offenders under this section; and
(2) allow the Department of Juvenile Services to take a digital image of the
juvenile registrant.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.